Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.120

Private practice of law—Deputies and assistants—Prohibited.

No full time deputy or assistant attorney general shall practice law for remuneration in his or her private capacity:

(1) As an attorney in any court of this state during his or her continuance in office; or

(2) As adviser or advocate for any person who may wish to become his or her client.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5054; 1973 c 43 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 43: See note following RCW 43.10.010.